California, session 20252026, AB1132.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The Transportation Agency finalized the Climate Action Plan for Transportation Infrastructure (CAPTI) in 2021, outlining recommendations for how to invest transportation dollars annually to combat climate change. Climate resilience is embedded within CAPTI to prevent impediments to travel within California and prevent significant fiscal impacts on road repair efforts with a concerted effort to support public health, safety, and equity.(b) Governor Newsom’s Executive Order N-19-19 requires every aspect of state government to redouble its efforts to reduce greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions and mitigate the impacts of climate change while building a sustainable, inclusive economy.(c) Governor Newsom’s Executive Order N-79-20 requires the sale of all passenger cars and trucks in California to be zero emission by 2035. Further, the state requires that by 2045, all medium- and heavy-duty trucks to be zero emission. To facilitate this change, relevant agencies are required to develop a Zero-Emissions Vehicle Market Development Strategy and affordable fueling options for those vehicles.(d) The California Transportation Plan 2050 defines statewide guidance to build healthy and resilient communities. The plan seeks to advance racial and economic justice by redirecting resources to marginalized communities, better connecting individuals to jobs, health care, education, and other opportunities, improving environmental justice, and amplifying the voices of those who have been historically excluded from the transportation decisionmaking process. The plan outlines California’s commitment to climate resilience and goal to be global leaders in climate policy, and sets aggressive benchmarks to reduce GHG emissions by 2050.(e) The Department of Transportation’s Vulnerability Assessment compiles data collected by the Department of Transportation to understand the potential climate impacts to the state highway system due to climate change. The assessment identifies climate change impacts to the state highway system and identifies a subset of state highway system assets on which to focus future efforts.(f) While efforts to make California’s transportation infrastructure more resilient in the face of climate change are valuable, they fail to consider community resilience, resulting in resilience strategies that protect physical transportation assets but neglect the people who depend on them most.SEC. 2. Section 14049 is added to the Government Code, to read:14049. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Climate change vulnerability assessment” means the Climate Change Vulnerability Assessment Technical and Summary Reports developed by the department.(2) “Community resilience” means the ability of a community to withstand, adapt to, or recover from climate-related disruptions to its infrastructure, critical resources, and services. Additional consideration for defining community resilience shall be shaped by community priorities and shall be refined through consultation with relevant stakeholders.(3) “Community resilience assessment” means an evaluation of the broader social and economic impacts on communities connected to the evaluated infrastructure risks, especially the communities that are most vulnerable to climate change risks. A community resilience assessment shall be completed across the state highway and passenger rail systems, with each element including an assessment on the impacts to priority populations. A community resilience assessment shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) An assessment of how disruptions to transportation infrastructure, including, but not limited to, highways, bridges, and passenger rail systems, caused by climate impacts, including, but not limited to, extreme heat, fires, floods, or sea level sea-level rise, disrupt access to essential services to communities, including, but not limited to, education, emergency services, employment centers, and health care.(B) Coordination with local jurisdictions and review of local evacuation plans to ensure that the state highway and passenger rail systems are facilitating alternative modes of evacuation, including, but not limited to, the use of public transit or school bus fleets, to assist people without access to personal vehicles and people who are unable to operate a vehicle. The guidance shall include recommendations for ensuring the accessibility of electric vehicle (EV) chargers along evacuation routes.(C) An assessment and identification of locations in communities for implementation of shelters or green infrastructure to mitigate the impacts of extreme heat. When identifying these locations, the assessment shall include coordination with local jurisdictions, with a particular emphasis on evaluating locally planned resilience infrastructure and their capacity to meet community needs, and shall prioritize high-risk areas.(D) A list of the highest risk locations and state highway and passenger rail system assets based on community resilience indicators.(4) “Community resilience indicators” means specific metrics used to measure and track the resilience of communities experiencing climate-induced transportation disruptions. These indicators shall be selected and continually evaluated with input from community stakeholders to ensure the indicators address the most pressing needs of affected populations, including, but not limited to, people with disabilities, the elderly, people without access to personal vehicles, people who are unable to operate vehicles, and other at-risk populations. Potential indicators include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A) Access to critical services, including, but not limited to, health care, education, employment, and emergency services, during climate events.(B) Availability and accessibility of electric vehicle charging infrastructure, particularly along evacuation routes or in underserved areas.(C) Protection strategies for maintenance workers, transit riders, and others who use transportation networks during extreme heat or other climate risks.(5) “Priority populations” means any of the following:(A) An area identified as being among the most disadvantaged 25 percent in the state according to the most recent update to the California Communities Environmental Health Screening tool, also known as CalEnviroScreen.(B) An area identified as a priority population in the department’s equity index.(C) An area within federally designated tribal lands.(D) A community that meets the regional definition of “environmental justice community,” “community of concern,” or “disadvantaged community,” if that regional definition is adopted as part of the applicable regional transportation plan, including the sustainable communities strategy, adopted pursuant to Section 65080.(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, 2029, the department shall identify key community resilience indicators for measuring the impacts of climate-induced transportation disruptions.(2) In complying with paragraph (1), the department shall hold at least one public workshop and include stakeholders from priority populations, including, but not limited to, representatives from local jurisdictions responsible for implementing resilience strategies.(3) The department shall consult with the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Office of Emergency Services in complying with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, 2030, the department shall include a community resilience assessment in the climate change vulnerability assessment that emphasizes the identification and evaluation of high-risk locations, especially those that serve priority populations.(2) In complying with paragraph (1), the department shall hold at least two public stakeholder meetings in each of its 12 transportation districts and the public stakeholder meetings shall include stakeholders from priority populations.(3) The department shall consult with the Department of the California Highway Patrol and the Office of Emergency Services in complying with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).